sample.txt.dix
<!-- Grammatical symbol declaration-->
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>abcedefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyzáéíóú</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="PresInd" c="Indicative present"/>
    <sdef n="1p" c="First person"/>
    <sdef n="sg" c="Singular"/>
    <sdef n="2p" c="Second person"/>
    <sdef n="pl" c="Plural"/>
  </sdefs>
<!-- etc.-->
<!-- Paradigm definition:-->
  <pardefs>
    <pardef n="ón">
      <e><p><l>ón</l><r>sg</r></p></e><!--nouns-->
      <e><p><l>ones</l><r>pl</r></p></e>
    </pardef> <!---'on-->
    <pardef n="pi1">
      <e><p><l>s</l><r><s n="2p"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e><!--indicative present-->
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="3p"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>mos</l><r><s n="1p"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>n</l><r><s n="3p"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ii1">
      <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="1p"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e><!--imperfective endings-->
      <e><p><l>as</l><r><s n="2p"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="3p"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ais</l><r><s n="2p"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>an</l><r><s n="3p"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="v1c">
      <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="Imper"/><s n="3p"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="pron1pl"/></e><!--first conj-->
      <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="Imper"/><s n="2p"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="pron1pl"/></e><!--with accent-->
      <e><p><l>en</l><r><s n="Imper"/><s n="3p"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="pron1p"/></e>
    </pardef> <!--in root-->
  </pardefs>
<!-- Dictionary-->
  <section id="main" type="standard">
    <e><p><l>am</l><r>amar<s n="verb"/></r></p><par n="V1C"/></e><!--amar-->
    <e><p><l>ám</l><r>amar<s n="verb"/></r></p><par n="v1c"/></e>
    <e><p><l>acci</l><r>acción<s n="noun"/><s n="fem"/></r></p><par n="ón"/></e><!--acci'on-->
  </section>
</dictionary>
